District of Columbia statutes.
47-211

Items included in annual estimates — Provision for real estate assessment.

The Mayor of said District shall in his annual estimates include all necessary provision to carry out the provisions of law relative to the assessment of real estate, to be immediately available.

History

Aug. 14, 1894, 28 Stat. 285, ch. 287, § 14
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Authority and procedure to establish real property tax rates, violations of assessment provisions, see § 47-828.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-828.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-211.
1973 Ed., § 47-209.